res/rules_separate/g2ps_ykanje.twolc
Alphabet

      %  ! space
      %-

      Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
      Ъ:0 Ь:0
      А   Е   Ё:О́ И О У Ы Э   Ю:У Я
      А́ А̂ Е́:Э́ Ё́   И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Э̂ Ю́:У́ Я́:А́
      А̀   Ѐ   Ё̀   Ѝ О̀ У̀ Ы̀ Э̀   Ю̀   Я̀

      б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ
      ъ:0 ь:0
      а   е   ё:о́ и  о у ы э   ю:у я   ʌ
      а́ â е́:э́ ё́   и́  о́ у́ ы́ э́ э̂ ю́:у́ я́:а́ '    ! ё́ is included to broaden coverage
      а̀   ѐ   ё̀   ѝ  о̀ у̀ ы̀ э̀   ю̀   я̀ ;

Sets

! Consonants
C = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ
    б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

! Consonants, excluding { Ж ж Й й Ч ч Ш ш Щ щ Ц ц }
CNoSoftHard = Б В Г Д З К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х
              б в г д з к л м н п р с т ф х ;

! Hard consonants
HardC = Ж Ц Ш
        ж ц ш ;

! Stressed vowels
StressedV = А́ Е́ Ё́ Ё И́ О́ У́ Ы́ Э́ Ю́ Я́
            а́ е́ ё́ ё и́ о́ у́ ы́ э́ ю́ я́ ;

! Unstressed vowels
UnstressedV = А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я
              а е и о у ы э ю я ;

! Vowels that indicate softness
SoftV = Е Ё И Ю Я
        Е́ Ё́ И́ Ю́ Я́
        е ё и ю я
        е́ ё́ и́ ю́ я́ ;

Definitions

Rules

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 00: Soften consonants before 'soft' vowels and ь (excluding { Ж ж Ц ц Ш ш Ч ч Щ щ Й й })"
0:' <=> CNoSoftHard: _ [ SoftV: | ь: ] ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 11: Ykanje: unstressed vowel reduction for { е } after { ж ш ц } in pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> .#. [: - StressedV:]* HardC: _ [ C: | ь: | :']* StressedV: ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ы ы )
  matched ;

!! ============================================================================
"Rule 12: Ykanje: unstressed е after { ж ш ц } in non-pre-tonic location"
Vx:Vy <=> HardC: _ [ [ C: | ь: | :']* UnstressedV: [ C: | ь: | :']* ]+ StressedV: ;
          StressedV: :* HardC: _ ;
where Vx in ( Е е )
      Vy in ( Ъ ъ )
  matched ;
